District of Columbia statutes.
20-355

After-discovered property.

The personal representative shall report to the Court immediately, by verified supplemental petition, any property of the decedent discovered after the filing of the petition. If the after-discovered property increases the value of all property of the decedent to an amount greater than the allowable funeral expenses (and there is no family allowance payable) but less than $15,000, the Court shall admit the will, if any, to probate and direct that notice be given in accordance with section 20-353(b) . If the after-discovered property increases the value of all property of the decedent to more than $15,000, there shall be no further proceedings under this subchapter, and administration shall proceed under the other provisions of this title.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(r), 42 DCR 63

History

1981 Ed., § 20-355.

Prior Codifications

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-304.

Editor's Notes